en: Sesame seed roast level: Dark roasted; Double roasted; Lightly roasted; Medium roasted; Raw/unroasted; Roasted; Other
sv: Sesamfrön – rostningsnivå: Mörkrostad; Dubbelrostad; Lättrostad; Mellanrostad; Rå/orostad; Rostad; Övrigt
ja: ごまの焙煎度: 深煎り; 二度焙煎; 浅煎り; 中煎り; 生/未焙煎; 焙煎済み; その他
fi: Seesaminsiementen paahtoaste: Tummaksi paahdettu; Tuplapaahdettu; Kevyesti paahdettu; Keskipaahdettu; Raaka/paahtamaton; Paahdettu; Muu
vi: Mức độ rang hạt mè: Rang đậm; Rang hai lần; Rang nhạt; Rang vừa; Thô/chưa rang; Đã rang; Khác
zh-CN: 芝麻烘烤程度: 深度烘焙; 双重烘焙; 轻度烘焙; 中度烘焙; 生/未烘焙; 烘焙; 其他
sk-SK: Stupeň praženia sezamových semienok: Tmavé pražené; Dvojito pražené; Svetlo pražené; Stredne pražené; Surové/nepražené; Pražené; Iné
pt-BR: Semente de gergelim nível de torra: Torra escura; Torra dupla; Torra leve; Torra média; Cru/não torrado; Torrado; Outro
fr: Degré de torréfaction des graines de sésame: Torréfaction foncée; Double torréfaction; Légèrement torréfié; Torréfaction moyenne; Cru/non torréfié; Torréfié; Autre
pl: Stopień prażenia nasion sezamu: Mocno palony; Podwójnie palony; Lekko palony; Średnio palony; Surowy/niepalony; Palony; Inne
de: Röstgrad der Sesamsamen: Dunkel geröstet; Doppelt geröstet; Leicht geröstet; Mittel geröstet; Roh/Ungeröstet; Geröstet; Andere
es: Nivel de tostado de las semillas de sésamo: Tueste oscuro; Tueste doble; Tueste ligero; Tueste medio; Crudo/sin tostar; Tostado; Otro
ro-RO: Nivel de prăjire al semințelor de susan: Prăjite intens; Dublu prăjite; Ușor prăjite; Mediu prăjite; Crude/neprăjite; Prăjite; Altele
ru: Степень обжарки кунжутных семян: Темной обжарки; Двойной обжарки; Светлой обжарки; Средней обжарки; Сырые/необжаренные; Обжаренные; Другое
hr-HR: Razina prženja sjemenki sezama: Tamno prženo; Dvostruko prženo; Lagano prženo; Srednje prženo; Sirovo / neprženo; Prženo; Ostalo
tr: Susam kavurma seviyesi: Koyu kavrulmuş; Çifte kavrulmuş; Az kavrulmuş; Orta kavrulmuş; Çiğ/kavrulmamış; Kavrulmuş; Diğer
hu: Szezámmag pörkölési szintje: Sötét pörkölésű; Duplán pörkölt; Világos pörkölésű; Közepes pörkölésű; Nyers / Pörköletlen; Pörkölt; Egyéb
lt-LT: Sezamo sėklų skrudinimo lygis: Tamsaus skrudinimo; Dvigubo skrudinimo; Šviesaus skrudinimo; Vidutinio skrudinimo; Žalios / neskrudintos; Skrudintos; Kita
th: ระดับการคั่วเมล็ดงา: คั่วเข้ม; คั่วสองรอบ; คั่วอ่อน; คั่วกลาง; ดิบ/ไม่คั่ว; คั่ว; อื่นๆ
cs: Stupeň pražení sezamových semínek: Tmavě pražená; Dvojitě pražená; Lehce pražená; Středně pražená; Syrová/nepražená; Pražená; Jiné
da: Sesamfrøristningsniveau: Mørkristet; Dobbelt ristet; Letristet; Mellemristet; Rå/uristet; Ristet; Andet
sl-SI: Stopnja praženja sezamovih semen: Močno praženo; Dvojno praženo; Rahlo praženo; Srednje praženo; Surovo/nepraženo; Praženo; Drugo
nl: Sesamzaad roosteringsniveau: Donker gebrand; Dubbel gebrand; Licht gebrand; Medium gebrand; Rauw/ongebrand; Geroosterd; Overig
it: Livello di tostatura dei semi di sesamo: Tostatura scura; Doppia tostatura; Leggera tostatura; Tostatura media; Crudo/Non tostato; Tostato; Altro
nb: Ristenivå for sesamfrø: Mørkristet; Dobbeltristet; Lettristet; Mellomristet; Rå/uristet; Ristet; Annet
ko: 참깨 볶음 정도: 다크 로스팅; 더블 로스팅; 라이트 로스팅; 미디엄 로스팅; 생/비로스팅; 로스팅; 기타
el: Επίπεδο καβουρδίσματος σουσαμιού: Σκούρο καβούρδισμα; Διπλό καβούρδισμα; Ελαφρύ καβούρδισμα; Μεσαίο καβούρδισμα; Ωμό/ακαβούρδιστο; Καβουρδισμένο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 芝麻烘焙程度: 重度烘焙; 雙重烘焙; 輕度烘焙; 中度烘焙; 生/未烘焙; 烘焙; 其他
bg-BG: Степен на печене на сусамово семе: Тъмно изпечено; Двойно изпечено; Леко изпечено; Средно изпечено; Сурово/непечено; Печено; Друго
pt-PT: Grau de torrefação das sementes de sésamo: Torra escura; Dupla torra; Ligeiramente torradas; Torra média; Cruas/não torradas; Torradas; Outro